Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. FINANCES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY FINANCES

CHAPTER 116. DEPOSITORIES FOR COUNTY PUBLIC FUNDS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 116.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Bank" means a:

(A) bank organized under the laws of this state, another state, or federal law that has its main office or a branch office in this state; or

(B) savings and loan association or savings bank organized under the laws of this state, another state, or federal law that has its main office or a branch office in this state.

(2) "Demand deposit" means a deposit of funds that may be withdrawn on the demand of the depositor.

(3) "Time deposit" means a deposit of funds subject to a contract between the depositor and the depository under which the depositor may not withdraw any of the funds by check or by another manner until the expiration of a certain period following written notice of the depositor's intent to withdraw the funds.

(4) "Subdepository bank" means an authorized bank, other than a depository, that holds demand deposits, not exceeding the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation's limit, of a district, county, or precinct officer.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 234, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 344, Sec. 5.009, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 116.002. MONEY AFFECTED. (a) This chapter applies to money collected or held by a district, county, or precinct officer in a county and by the officers of a defined district or subdivision in the county, including the funds of a municipal or quasi-municipal subdivision or corporation that has the power to select its own depository but has not done so. The money shall be deposited under this chapter, and the money shall be considered in fixing, and is protected by, a county depository's bond.

(b) Orders for payment, checks, and vouchers evidencing the money deposited in the county depository under Subsection (a) are subject to audit and countersignature as provided by law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. ESTABLISHMENT OF DEPOSITORY

Sec. 116.021. DEPOSITORY AND SUBDEPOSITORY CONTRACTS. (a) The commissioners court of a county shall select by the process provided by this subchapter or by Subchapter C, Chapter 262, one or more banks in the county and enter a contract with each selected bank for the deposit of the county's public funds. The county shall contract with a bank under this section for a two-year or four-year contract term. On expiration of a contract under this section, the contract may be renewed for two years under terms negotiated by the commissioners court.

(b) If the contract is for a four-year term, the contract shall allow the county to establish, on the basis of negotiations with the bank, new interest rates and financial terms of the contract that will take effect during the final two years of the four-year contract.

(c) On the renewal of a contract, the county may negotiate new interest rates and terms with the bank for the next two years in the same way and subject to the same conditions as provided by Subsection (b).

(d) If for any reason a county depository is not selected under Subsection (a), the commissioners court, at any subsequent time after 20 days' notice, may select, by the process described by Section 116.024 or by negotiated bid, one or more depositories in the same manner as at the regular time.

(e) If the commissioners court selects a depository by the process provided by Subchapter C, Chapter 262, the depository may be selected by:

(1) competitive bidding; or

(2) another method under that subchapter that the county is qualified to use.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 65, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 116.022. NOTICE. (a) Once each week for at least 20 days before the date to submit an application under Section 116.023(a), the county judge shall place over the judge's name in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a notice that the commissioners court intends to receive applications from which to select a depository bank. A notice shall also be posted at the courthouse door of the county.

(b) If a newspaper is not published in the county, the newspaper notice shall be placed in a newspaper published in the nearest county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 65, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 116.023. APPLICATIONS. (a) A bank in the county that wants to be a county depository must deliver its application to the county judge or a designated representative of the judge on or before a date set by the commissioners court that is no later than the 60th day before the date of the expiration of the existing depository contract.

(b) The application must state the amount of the bank's paid-up capital stock and permanent surplus, and the application must be accompanied by:

(1) a statement showing the financial condition of the bank on the date of the application; and

(2) a certified check or cashier's check for at least one-half percent of the county's revenue for the preceding year.

(c) The certified or cashier's check that accompanies an application is a good-faith guarantee on the part of the applicant that if accepted as a county depository it will execute the bond required under this chapter. If a bank is selected as a depository and does not provide the bond, the county shall retain the amount of the check as liquidated damages, and the county judge shall readvertise for applications, if necessary, to obtain a depository for the county.

(d) A bank in the county that wants to be a county subdepository must comply with Subsections (a) and (b)(1). The subdepository's application must include a proposal outlining its security for the county public funds to be held in addition to revenue offers.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 628, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 116.024. SELECTION OF DEPOSITORIES AND SUBDEPOSITORIES. (a) At the meeting at which banks are to be selected as county depositories, the commissioners court shall:

(1) enter in the minutes of the court all applications filed with the county judge;

(2) consider all applications; and

(3) select the qualified applicants that offer the most favorable terms and conditions for the handling of the county funds.

(b) The commissioners court may reject those applicants whose management or condition, in the opinion of the commissioners court, does not warrant placing county funds in their possession.

(c) After selecting one or more county depositories, the commissioners court shall immediately return the certified checks of the rejected applicants. The commissioners court shall return the check of a successful applicant when the applicant executes and files a depository bond that is approved by the commissioners court.

(d) The conflict of interests provisions of Section 131.903 apply to the selection of the depositories.

(e) After selecting one or more subdepositories, the commissioners court shall immediately notify each selected applicant of its selection. Within 15 days, the selected applicant must file a bond or other security as approved by the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 4, 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2641), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 116.025. DESIGNATION OF DEPOSITORY OR SUBDEPOSITORY. When security is provided in accordance with Subchapter C and is approved by the commissioners court, the commissioners court shall, by an order entered in its minutes, designate the bank as a depository or subdepository for the funds of the county. The designation is effective until the end of the 60th day after the date fixed for the next selection of a depository or subdepository.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 116.026. APPLICANTS OUTSIDE COUNTY. (a) If no bank located in the county applies to be designated as the county depository, the commissioners court may advertise, in the same manner provided by Section 116.022 for advertising for a depository within the county, for applications from banks in an adjoining county or any other county in this state.

(b) If only one bank located in the county applies to be designated as the county depository, the commissioners court may reject the applicant if the applicant proposes terms that:

(1) are not in the best interest of the county;

(2) are not financially competitive with the financial market outside the county; or

(3) impose noncompetitive fees.

(c) If the commissioners court rejects the applicant under Subsection (b), the commissioners court may advertise, in the same manner provided by Section 116.022 for advertising for a depository within the county, for applications from banks in an adjoining county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1043 (S.B. 158), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 116.027. SELECTION OF NONAPPLICANT DEPOSITORY. (a) If no application to be a county depository is submitted, or if all of the applications are declined, the commissioners court shall deposit the funds of the county with any one or more banks in the county or in the adjoining counties in the amounts and for the periods as the commissioners court considers advisable.

(b) A bank that receives deposits under this section shall provide security in the manner and form, and subject to the same conditions, as is required for a depository of county funds. The penalty of the security must at least equal the total amount of county funds deposited with the bank.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.028. SUCCESSOR BANK AS COUNTY DEPOSITORY. (a) If a bank selected to be a county depository and holding county funds is sold to another bank in an adjoining county, the successor bank in the adjoining county may continue to serve as a county depository and apply and be selected as a county depository if the successor bank:

(1) continues to have an office in an adjoining county; and

(2) timely applies and is selected to be a county depository in a manner that ensures no lapse of service as a county depository.

(b) If a bank selected as a county depository and holding county funds closes, a branch of the bank in an adjoining county may continue to serve as a county depository and apply to be a county depository if the successor bank:

(1) continues to have an office in an adjoining county; and

(2) timely applies and is selected to be a county depository in a manner that ensures no lapse of service as a county depository.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1043 (S.B. 158), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. SECURITY FOR FUNDS HELD BY DEPOSITORY

Sec. 116.051. QUALIFICATION AS DEPOSITORY OR SUBDEPOSITORY. Within 15 days after the date a bank is selected as a county depository or subdepository, the bank must qualify as the depository or subdepository by providing security for the funds to be deposited by the county with the bank. The depository or subdepository may secure these funds, at the option of the commissioners court, by:

(1) personal bond; surety bond; bonds, notes, and other securities; first mortgages on real property; real property; certificates of deposit; or a combination of these methods, as provided by this subchapter; or

(2) investment securities or interests in them as provided by Chapter 726, Acts of the 67th Legislature, Regular Session, 1981 (Article 2529b-1, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes).

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 15(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 116.052. PERSONAL BOND. (a) One or more personal bonds executed and filed with the commissioners court, payable to the county judge and the judge's successors in office, qualify as security under this subchapter if:

(1) the bonds are signed by at least five solvent sureties who own unencumbered real property in the state that is not exempt from execution under the constitution and other laws of this state;

(2) the unencumbered and nonexempt real property owned by the sureties has a value at least equal to the amount of the bonds; and

(3) the bonds are approved by the commissioners court.

(b) When a bond is filed for approval with the commissioners court under Subsection (a), the sureties shall also file a statement containing:

(1) a description of the unencumbered and nonexempt real property sufficient to identify it on the ground; and

(2) the value of each tract of real property listed, including the value of the improvements on the property.

(c) After the commissioners court approves a personal bond, it shall be filed in the county clerk's office with the statement of the sureties attached to the bond.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.053. SURETY BOND. (a) One or more bonds issued and executed by one or more solvent surety companies authorized to do business in this state, payable to the county judge and the judge's successors in office and filed with the commissioners court, qualifies as security under this subchapter if the bond is approved by the commissioners court.

(b) After the commissioners court approves a surety bond, it shall be filed in the county clerk's office.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.054. BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER SECURITIES. (a) A county depository may pledge with the commissioners court as security under this subchapter:

(1) a bond, note, security of indebtedness, or other evidence of indebtedness of the United States if the evidence of indebtedness is supported by the full faith and credit of the United States or is guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States;

(2) a bond of this state or of a county, municipality, independent school district, or common school district;

(3) a bond issued under the federal farm loan acts;

(4) a road district bond;

(5) a bond, pledge, or other security issued by the board of regents of The University of Texas System;

(6) bank acceptances of banks having a capital stock of at least $500,000;

(7) a note or bond secured by mortgages insured and debentures issued by the Federal Housing Administration;

(8) shares or share accounts of a savings and loan association organized under the laws of this state or of a federal savings and loan association domiciled in this state if the payment of the share or share accounts is insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation; or

(9) a bond issued by a municipal corporation in this state.

(b) Securities provided under this section must have a total market value equal to the amount of the depository bond.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.055. FIRST MORTGAGES ON IMPROVED REAL PROPERTY. (a) If approved by the commissioners court, closed first mortgages on improved and unencumbered real property located in this state that are assigned to the county judge in a duly acknowledged instrument qualify as security under this subchapter.

(b) Before approving a mortgage as security, the commissioners court shall require:

(1) a written opinion by an attorney selected by the commissioners court showing that the lien is superior to any other claim to or right in the real property; and

(2) insurance approved by the county judge covering the improvements on each tract of pledged real property and providing that a loss is payable to the county judge.

(c) An insurance policy required under Subsection (b) must be issued by a stock fire insurance company or mutual fire insurance company that has a $100,000 surplus in excess of all legal reserves and other liabilities.

(d) A mortgage accepted as security under this section shall immediately be recorded in each county in which part of the real property is located.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.056. REAL PROPERTY. (a) If approved by the commissioners court, improved and unencumbered real property, pledged directly by deed of trust to a trustee selected by the commissioners court, with the county judge as beneficiary, qualifies as security under this subchapter.

(b) Before approving real property offered as security, the commissioners court shall require:

(1) a written opinion by an attorney selected by the commissioners court showing that the lien is superior to any other claim to or right in the real property; and

(2) insurance approved by the county judge covering the improvements on the pledged real property and providing that a loss is payable to the county judge.

(c) An insurance policy required under Subsection (b) must be issued by a stock fire insurance company or mutual fire insurance company that has a $100,000 surplus in excess of all legal reserves and other liabilities.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.0565. CERTIFICATE OF DEPOSIT. (a) A certificate of deposit qualifies as security under this subchapter if the certificate is:

(1) held in the custody of a Federal Reserve Bank for safekeeping and made the subject of a valid pledge agreement designating the county as the beneficiary of the pledge agreement;

(2) insured in full by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(3) described in detail by a safekeeping receipt issued to the county by the Federal Reserve Bank having custody of the certificates; and

(4) issued with the county as registered owner.

(b) A person to whom presentment of a certificate of deposit pledged to secure county funds is made may not pay or otherwise accept the certificate unless the certificate or the safekeeping receipt required by this section has been endorsed by the county and the depository.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 15(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 116.057. CONDITION OF PERSONAL BOND OR CONTRACT FOR SECURITIES. (a) A personal bond provided or a contract for the pledge of securities under this subchapter must be conditioned that the depository will:

(1) faithfully keep the county funds and faithfully perform all duties and obligations imposed by law on the depository;

(2) pay all checks drawn on a demand deposit account in a depository on presentation by the county treasurer;

(3) pay all checks drawn on a time deposit account on presentation after the expiration of the required period of notice; and

(4) account for the county funds as required by law.

(b) A suit on a personal bond or a contract for securities provided or pledged under this subchapter must be tried in the county for which the depository is selected.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.058. AMOUNT OF SECURITY REQUIRED. (a) Personal or surety bonds that secure county deposits must be in an amount equal to the estimated highest daily balance of the county, as determined by the commissioners court. However, the commissioners court may not estimate the highest daily balance at an amount that is less than 75 percent of the highest daily balance of the county for the preceding year, less the amount of bond funds received and expended.

(b) Securities pledged to secure county funds on deposit in a depository must be in an amount equal to the amount of those funds. However, real property securities may not be required in an amount greater than 25 percent of the assessed value of the property in the county, as shown by the certified tax roll for the preceding year.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.059. VALUATION OF REAL PROPERTY PROVIDED AS SECURITY. The commissioners court shall investigate all real property security and determine the value at which the property will be accepted. The commissioners court may not accept real property as security at a value greater than 50 percent of the reasonable market value of the property covered by a mortgage unless the mortgage is insured or guaranteed by the Federal Housing Administration.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.060. SECURITY NOT REQUIRED FOR FEDERALLY INSURED DEPOSITS. A depository is not required to provide security for the deposit of county funds to the extent the deposits are insured under 12 U.S.C.A. Sections 1811-1832.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER D. MAINTENANCE AND MODIFICATION OF SECURITY

Sec. 116.081. NEW BOND. (a) The commissioners court may by written order require a depository to execute a new bond whenever the commissioners court considers it advisable or considers it necessary for the protection of the county.

(b) Except for an additional bond required under Section 116.087, if a depository fails for any reason to file the required new bond within five days after the date the depository is served with a copy of the order, the commissioners court may select a new depository in the same manner as it would select a depository at the regular time.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.082. SUBSTITUTION OF SECURITIES. (a) After reasonable notice to the commissioners court, a depository is entitled to substitute one type of security for another or replace particular securities with others of the same type if the substituting or replacing security meets the requirements of law and is approved by the commissioners court. Instead of approval of each substitute or replacement security by the commissioners court, the commissioners court may:

(1) adopt a procedure for approving a substitute or replacement security under this section; and

(2) designate a county employee or official, including a county judge, to approve the substitute or replacement security under the procedure adopted under Subdivision (1).

(b) The county judge shall execute the necessary instruments to transfer to the depository or its order a lien withdrawn from real property for which another security is substituted.

(c) The commissioners court may direct the manner in which securities pledged in place of personal or surety bonds are to be deposited.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 742, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 116.083. RELEASE OF EXCESS SECURITY. If the securities pledged by a depository to secure county funds exceed the amount required under this chapter, the commissioners court shall permit the release of the excess.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.084. INADEQUATE SECURITY. If for any reason the county funds on deposit with the county depository exceed the amount of security pledged, the depository shall immediately pledge additional security with the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.085. SOLVENCY OF PERSONAL SURETY. (a) At least twice each year while a personal bond securing the county's deposits is in effect, the commissioners court shall investigate the solvency of each surety on the bond. The commissioners court may require the surety to make an itemized and verified financial statement correctly showing the surety's financial position and, if the bond requires the surety to own real property, identifying each tract of real property owned by the surety and stating its value.

(b) The commissioners court shall require a depository to provide a new bond meeting the requirements of this chapter if a financial statement provided under Subsection (a) indicates that:

(1) a surety is insolvent;

(2) a surety's net worth is less than the amount required by this chapter;

(3) the assets listed on the statement are depreciated or their value is in any way impaired; or

(4) real property required by the bond has been disposed of or encumbered and the value of the surety's remaining unencumbered and nonexempt real property is inadequate to meet the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.086. SOLVENCY OF SURETY COMPANY AND ADEQUACY OF SECURITIES. Whenever the commissioners court considers it necessary for the protection of the county, the commissioners court may investigate the solvency of a surety company that issues a bond on behalf of a depository of county funds or investigate the value of securities pledged by a depository to secure county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.087. ADDITIONAL BOND. (a) If after a county establishes a depository the county or a subdivision of the county receives funds from the sale of bonds or otherwise, at the next meeting of the commissioners court, or as soon afterward as is practical, the commissioners court may make written demand on the depository to provide an additional bond in an amount equal to the amount of funds received. If county funds derived from the sale of county securities during the term of a depository bond are deposited with the depository, the commissioners court shall require an additional bond in an amount equal to the additional county funds. The depository shall continue the additional bond in effect as long as the additional funds remain in the depository.

(b) The depository may cancel this extra or special bond and concurrently substitute a new bond for it as the additional funds are reduced. However, the additional bond must always at least equal the amount of the additional funds.

(c) If a depository does not provide an additional bond under Subsection (a) within 30 days after the date the commissioners court demands the additional bond, the commissioners court may withdraw the additional funds from the depository by the draft of the county treasurer and deposit them in a solvent national or state bank that has a combined capital stock and surplus greater than the amount of the additional funds. The commissioners court may leave the additional funds on deposit with this alternative bank until the county depository files the required additional bond with the commissioners court, after which the commissioners court shall redeposit the balance of the additional funds with the county depository.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.088. RELEASE OF SURETY COMPANY. (a) A surety company may be relieved of its obligations under a surety bond executed on behalf of a county depository after the 30th day after the date it gives written notice to the commissioners court requesting to be released.

(b) A surety company is not relieved under Subsection (a) of liability for a loss sustained by the county before the expiration of the bond.

(c) If a depository's surety company requests to be relieved from its obligations under Subsection (a), the depository shall provide further security acceptable to the commissioners court to secure county funds under this chapter. The depository shall provide the further security before termination of the surety's obligations under the bond. The new security shall be filed in the county clerk's office.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.089. SURRENDER OF INTEREST ON SECURITIES. On the request of a county depository, the commissioners court shall surrender, when due, interest coupons or other evidence of interest on securities deposited by the depository with the commissioners court if the securities remaining pledged by a depository are adequate to meet the requirements of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER E. DEPOSITORY ACCOUNTS

Sec. 116.111. CHARACTER AND AMOUNT OF DEPOSITS. The commissioners court may determine and designate the character and amount of county funds that will be demand deposits and that will be time deposits. The commissioners court may contract with a depository for interest on time deposits at any legal rate under a federal law or under a rule adopted by the board of governors of the Federal Reserve System or by the board of directors of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.112. INVESTMENT OF FUNDS. (a) The commissioners court may direct the county treasurer to withdraw any county funds deposited in a county depository that are not immediately required to pay obligations of the county and invest those funds as provided by this section unless such an investment or withdrawal is prohibited by law or the withdrawal is contrary to the terms of the depository contract.

(b) The funds may be invested in accordance with Subchapter A, Chapter 2256, Government Code. In addition to the obligations, certificates, and agreements described by that Act, the funds may be invested in certificates of deposit issued by a state or federal savings and loan association domiciled in this state, the payment of which is insured in full by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or its successor.

(c) If a county purchases a security repurchase agreement, the agreement must be purchased under a master contractual agreement that specifies the rights and obligations of both parties and that requires that securities involved in the transaction be held in a safekeeping account subject to the control and custody of the county.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 754, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1989.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 15(c), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 754, Sec. 1, 2, eff. June 15, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(11), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 116.113. DEPOSIT OF FUNDS. (a) Immediately after the commissioners court designates a county depository, the county treasurer shall transfer to the depository all of the county's funds and the funds of any district or municipal subdivision of the county that does not select its own depository. The treasurer shall also immediately deposit with the depository to the credit of the county, district, or municipality any money received after the depository is designated.

(b) A county tax assessor-collector shall immediately deposit in the county depository taxes collected on behalf of the state, the county, or a district or municipal subdivision of the county. The taxes remain on deposit pending the preparation and settlement of the assessor-collector's report on the tax collections.

(c) If a commissioners court that controls school district funds elects to transfer the funds during a school year from a county depository to another bank, the school district may require the commissioners court to delay the transfer until the earlier of the end of the school district's current fiscal year or the next September 1.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.114. COLLECTIONS BY DEPOSITORY. A county depository shall collect all checks, drafts, and demands for money deposited with it by the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.115. CLEARINGHOUSE FOR MULTIPLE DEPOSITORIES. If the funds of a county are deposited with more than one depository, the commissioners court shall by order name one of the depositories to act as a clearinghouse for the others. All county orders for payment are finally payable at the depository named as the clearinghouse.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 116.116. OBLIGATIONS PAYABLE AT COUNTY DEPOSITORY. (a) A county depository shall pay a check or order for payment drawn by the county treasurer against funds deposited with the depository on presentation of the check or order if the funds subject to the check or order are in the possession of the depository, and, in the case of a time deposit, if the agreed period of notice has expired.

(b) If the commissioners court selects a depository in another county, the depository shall file a statement with the county treasurer designating the place in the county governed by the commissioners court where, and the person by whom, deposits by the treasurer may be received and checks will be paid, or the place in another county where deposits may be made and checks may be paid. The statement must be filed within five days after the date notice is given to the depository of its selection.

(c) An order for payment or check, including an order or check issued prior to September 1, 1993, issued by the county treasurer in settlement of a claim against a county that is not presented for payment before the 366th day following the date of issuance is overdue and nonnegotiable. The sum of the overdue order or check shall be credited as revenue to the county if delivery to the payees was attempted or occurred within a reasonable time following the issuance of the order or check. No right to full settlement of a proper unpaid claim is extinguished by this subsection.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 329, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1043 (S.B. 158), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 116.117. STATEMENTS OF ACCOUNT. A depository shall make a detailed monthly statement to the commissioners court at each regular term of the court. The statement must show the daily balance credited to each of the funds on deposit.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.118. DEBTS PAYABLE OTHER THAN AT COUNTY TREASURY. The commissioners court may instruct the county treasurer to deposit money adequate to pay a bond, coupon, or other indebtedness of the county at a place other than at the county treasury if by its terms the indebtedness is payable on maturity at the other location and if the payment is otherwise made in the manner required by law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.119. REQUIREMENTS FOR AUDITING AND COUNTERSIGNING UNAFFECTED. This chapter does not affect the application of a law or regulation providing for auditing and countersigning.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.120. COLLECTION OF CERTAIN OVERDUE COUNTY ORDERS FOR PAYMENT OR CHECKS. (a) This section applies only to an order for payment or check issued by a county treasurer in settlement of a claim against a county that has not been presented for payment.

(b) A person attempting to recover funds from the county for a check or order for payment issued by the county treasurer may not charge the person to whom the check or order was issued and on whose behalf the attempted recovery is made, or that person's successors or assigns, a fee in an amount equal to more than 10 percent of the face value of the check or order.

(c) A county treasurer may collect a reasonable research fee to determine if a claim submitted under this section is valid. The treasurer may include the costs of inquiries to depository banks, research of accounting records, and other similar actions in setting the fee. A county treasurer may require the fee to be paid before a claim may be processed or researched under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 142, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER F. LIABILITIES

Sec. 116.151. LIABILITIES OF SURETIES ON SEPARATE BONDS. If a county depository provides separate bonds to secure county funds, each surety under a bond is liable only for that part of a loss resulting from the failure of the depository that bears to the total loss the same ratio as the amount of the bond bears to the total amount of all bonds and securities held by the county for the protection of the funds covered by the bond.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.152. SUBROGATION OF SURETIES. If a personal surety or a surety company pays for a loss to a county under a depository bond, the surety is subrogated to the rights of the county in an amount equal to the amount of the surety's payment. However, the amount of the subrogation may not exceed the amount of the deposit secured by the surety at the time of the depository's default.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.153. PRO RATA RECOVERY BY STATE AND COUNTY. If a county depository becomes insolvent and it becomes necessary to resort to the depository's bond or bonds to recover funds of the county and the state, the state and county are entitled to share pro rata in the recovery.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.154. LIABILITY OF DEPOSITORY PENDING COLLECTION OF DEPOSITS. A county depository that uses due diligence to collect a check, draft, or demand for money deposited by the county with the depository is not liable for the collection until the proceeds have been received by the depository. The depository shall charge the county and the county shall pay a collection expense that the depository may not pay or absorb because of a federal law or a regulation adopted by the board of governors of the Federal Reserve System or by the board of directors of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 116.155. FAILURE OF DEPOSITORY TO PAY CHECK OR ORDER FOR PAYMENT. A depository that does not pay a check or order for payment as required by Section 116.116(a) is liable for and shall pay to the holder 10 percent of the amount of the check or order for payment, and the commissioners court shall revoke the order creating the depository.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2011.